Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1219.
do enact as follows:AB1219,11Section 1. 11.1101 (figure) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,2,22Figure 11.1101: - See PDF for table AB1219,21Section 2. 11.1101 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,3,5211.1101 (1) Individual limits. (intro.) An individual may contribute to a 3candidate committee, political party, or legislative campaign committee no more 4than the following amounts specified for the a candidate whose nomination or 5election the individual committee or party supports [See Figure 11.1101 following]:AB1219,36Section 3. 11.1101 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,3,9711.1101 (1) (a) Candidates for governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of 8state, state treasurer, attorney general, state superintendent, or justice, $20,000 9$10,000.AB1219,410Section 4. 11.1101 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,3,151111.1101 (2) Candidate committees. (intro.) A candidate committee may 12contribute to another candidate committee, a political party, or a legislative 13campaign committee no more than the following amounts specified for the a 14candidate whose nomination or election the other candidate committee, political 15party, or legislative campaign committee supports [See Figure 11.1101 following]:AB1219,516Section 5. 11.1101 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,4,3111.1101 (2) (a) Candidates for governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of 2state, state treasurer, attorney general, state superintendent, or justice, $20,000 3$10,000.AB1219,64Section 6. 11.1101 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,4,9511.1101 (3) Political action committees. A political action committee may 6contribute to a political party or legislative campaign committee no more than 7$12,000 in any calendar year, and to a candidate committee no more than the 8following amounts specified for the candidate whose nomination or election the 9committee supports [See Figure 11.1101 following]:AB1219,4,1010(a) Candidates for governor, $86,000 $43,000.AB1219,4,1111(b) Candidates for lieutenant governor, $26,000 $13,000.AB1219,4,1212(c) Candidates for attorney general, $44,000 $22,000.AB1219,4,1413(d) Candidates for secretary of state, state treasurer, state superintendent, or 14justice, $18,000 $9,000.AB1219,4,1515(e) Candidates for state senator, $2,000 $1,000.AB1219,4,1616(f) Candidates for representative to the assembly, $1,000 $500.AB1219,4,1817(g) Candidates for court of appeals judge in districts which contain a county 18having a population of more than 750,000, $6,000 $3,000.AB1219,4,1919(h) Candidates for court of appeals judge in other districts, $5,000 $2,500.AB1219,4,2220(i) Candidates for circuit judge in circuits having a population of more than 21300,000, or candidates for district attorney in prosecutorial units having a 22population of more than 300,000, $6,000 $3,000.AB1219,5,21(j) Candidates for circuit judge in other circuits or candidates for district 2attorney in other prosecutorial units, $2,000 $1,000.AB1219,5,43(k) Candidates for local offices, an amount equal to the greater of the 4following:AB1219,5,551. Four Two hundred dollars.AB1219,5,962. Two cents One cent times the number of inhabitants of the jurisdiction or 7district, according to the latest federal census or the census information on which 8the district is based, as certified by the appropriate filing officer, but not more than 9$5,000 $2,500.AB1219,710Section 7. 11.1101 (3) (k) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin 11Act 126 and 2025 Wisconsin Acts 7, section 2, and .... (this act), is repealed and 12recreated to read:AB1219,5,161311.1101 (3) (k) 2. One cent times the number of inhabitants of the jurisdiction 14or district, according to the latest federal census or the census information on which 15the district is based, as certified by the appropriate filing officer, as defined under s. 165.02 (4v) (b) to (d), but not more than $2,500.AB1219,817Section 8. 11.1101 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1219,5,221811.1101 (4) Other persons. A person, other than a person subject to sub. (1), 19(2), or (3) or s. 11.1112, may contribute to a political party or legislative campaign 20committee no more than $12,000 in any calendar year, and to a candidate 21committee no more than the following amounts specified for the candidate whose 22nomination or election the committee supports:AB1219,5,2323(a) Candidates for governor, $86,000 $43,000.AB1219,6,11(b) Candidates for lieutenant governor, $26,000 $13,000.AB1219,6,22(c) Candidates for attorney general, $44,000 $22,000.AB1219,6,43(d) Candidates for secretary of state, state treasurer, state superintendent, or 4justice, $18,000 $9,000.AB1219,6,55(e) Candidates for state senator, $2,000 $1,000.AB1219,6,66(f) Candidates for representative to the assembly, $1,000 $500.AB1219,6,87(g) Candidates for court of appeals judge in districts that contain a county 8having a population of more than 750,000, $6,000 $3,000.AB1219,6,99(h) Candidates for court of appeals judge in other districts, $5,000 $2,500.AB1219,6,1210(i) Candidates for circuit judge in circuits having a population of more than 11300,000, or candidates for district attorney in prosecutorial units having a 12population of more than 300,000, $6,000 $3,000.AB1219,6,1413(j) Candidates for circuit judge in other circuits or candidates for district 14attorney in other prosecutorial units, $2,000 $1,000.AB1219,6,1615(k) Candidates for local offices, an amount equal to the greater of the 16following:AB1219,6,17171. Four Two hundred dollars.AB1219,6,21182. Two cents One cent times the number of inhabitants of the jurisdiction or 19district, according to the latest federal census or the census information on which 20the district is based, as certified by the appropriate filing officer, but not more than 21$5,000 $2,500.AB1219,922Section 9. 11.1101 (4) (k) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin 1Act 126 and 2025 Wisconsin Acts 7, section 2, and .... (this act), is repealed and 2recreated to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1219 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1219 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1219 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1219 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1219: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting